Tennessee, session 114, SB0850.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-1-106(f)(1), is amended by deleting
the language "one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250)" and substituting instead "two
thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($2,250)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-1-106(f)(3), is amended by deleting
the year "2024" and substituting instead "2026".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect November 3, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0850
003021
- 1 -